Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1105.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Tiverton affordable housing units.
In the town of Tiverton, at any time that there exists less than ten percent (10%) affordable
housing in accordance with the provisions of § 45-53-3.1, the minimum number of affordable
housing units to be built by any developer in the town pursuant to any approved plan, permit or
project shall comprise of at least fifty percent (50%), of the units or dwellings constituting or
consisting of affordable housing units until there exists full compliance with affordable housing
requirements of chapter 53 of title 45.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002919
========